Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.36
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-829.36 to 81-829.75 shall be known and may be
cited as the Emergency Management Act.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 1, p. 1073;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.05;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 17;

Laws 2011, LB573, § 2.

Facilitating Business Rapid Response to State Declared Disasters Act, see section 48-3201.